Source/VSSpellChecker/NHunspell/ru_RU.aff
SFX A Y 93
SFX A   ый   ую           ый
SFX A   ый   ому          [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый   ом           [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый   ой           [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый   ого          [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый   ое           [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый   ою           [^ц]ый
SFX A   ый   ему          цый
SFX A   ый   ем           цый
SFX A   ый   ей           цый
SFX A   ый   его          цый
SFX A   ый   ее           цый
SFX A   ый   ая           ый
SFX A   ой   ыми          [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   ым           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   ых           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   ые           [^гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   ую           ой
SFX A   ой   ому          ой
SFX A   ой   ом           ой
SFX A   ой   ого          ой
SFX A   ой   ое           ой
SFX A   ой   ими          [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   им           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   их           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   ие           [гхкжшщч]ой
SFX A   ой   ая           ой
SFX A   й    ми           ый
SFX A   й    ми           [гхк]ий
SFX A   й    ми           [енржшщч]ий
SFX A   й    м            ый
SFX A   й    м            [гхк]ий
SFX A   й    м            [енржшщч]ий
SFX A   й    х            ый
SFX A   й    х            [гхк]ий
SFX A   й    х            [енржшщч]ий
SFX A   й    е            ый
SFX A   й    е            [гхк]ий
SFX A   й    е            [енржшщч]ий
SFX A   й    ю            ой
SFX A   ийся уюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся имся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся имися        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся ихся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся иеся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся емуся        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся емся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся ейся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся егося        [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся ееся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся еюся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ийся аяся         [шщ]ийся
SFX A   ий   ую           [жшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   ую           [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   яя           [ен]ий
SFX A   ий   ому          [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   ом           [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   ой           [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   ого          [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   ое           [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   ою           [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   ему          [енржшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   ем           [енржшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   ей           [енжшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   его          [енржшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   ее           [енжшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   ею           [енжшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   ая           [жшщч]ий
SFX A   ий   ая           [гхк]ий
SFX A   ий   юю           [ен]ий
SFX A   е    ми           [иы]е
SFX A   е    м            [иы]е
SFX A   е    х            [иы]е
SFX A   0    ыми          в
SFX A   0    ыми          ин
SFX A   0    ым           в
SFX A   0    ым           ин
SFX A   0    ых           в
SFX A   0    ых           ин
SFX A   0    ы            в
SFX A   0    ы            ин
SFX A   0    у            в
SFX A   0    у            ин
SFX A   0    ому          ин
SFX A   0    ом           в
SFX A   0    ом           ин
SFX A   0    ой           в
SFX A   0    ой           ин
SFX A   0    ого          ин
SFX A   0    о            в
SFX A   0    о            ин
SFX A   0    а            в
SFX A   0    а            ин
